Hawaii statutes.
§206E-122 Loans; insurance and guarantees.
The authority may procure insurance or guarantees against any default of its
loans, in amounts and from insurers or guarantors, as it deems necessary or
desirable. [L 1982, c 228, pt of §8]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next